Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-159.08
Judges; salary increase; when effective.

Section 48-159 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for judges of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court and to give effect to such salary as soon as same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 397, § 2, p. 1388;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 90.